test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_poovij_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - poovij+v2: # Ok, MLO; this is an odd paradigm - Sg Gen+Acc from contracted, further 3-syll. with n:nj-change. The other poovij-paradigm is contracted. 
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  pooṿ̣ij
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  puáhˊháá
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  puáhˊháá
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  puáˊhánjân
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  puáˊhánjist
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Com:  puáˊhánjáin
    poovij+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  puáhˊháánjttáá
    poovij+v2+N+Ess:  puáˊhánjin
    poovij+v2+N+Par:  puáˊhánjid
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  puáˊhánjeh
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  puáˊhánjij
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  puáˊhánjijd
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  puáˊhánjáid
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  puáˊhánjijn
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊhánjijguin
    poovij+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  puáˊhánjijttáá

  Noun - poovij+v1: # ok, MLO - see also puáhháán-yaml with an odd mixed paradigm; here cons gradation v7:hh
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Nom: pooṿij
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Gen: puáhˊháá
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Acc: puáhˊháá
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Ill: puáhˊhái
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Loc: puáhˊhást
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Com: puáhˊháin
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Abe: puáhˊhááttáá
    poovij+v1+N+Ess: puáˊhánin
    poovij+v1+N+Par: puáˊhánid
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Nom: puáhˊhááh
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Gen: puáhˊhái
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Acc: puáhˊháid
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Ill: puáhˊháid
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Loc: puáhˊháin
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Com: puáhˊháiguin
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Abe: puáhˊháittáá
    
